backend/sq_AL_cleaned.aff
SFX I3 jedh idhini vjedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jedh idhjani vjedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jedh idhmani vjedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jedh idhmëni vjedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jedh idhnani vjedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jedh idhuni vjedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jedh idhni [rv]jedh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igj jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igje jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igji jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igju jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igjma jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igjmë jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igjna jeg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jeg igjeni jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjini jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjjani jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjmani jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjmëni jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjnani jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjuni jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jeg igjni jeg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iq jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqe jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqi jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqma jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqmë jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqna jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqu jek po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jek iqeni jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iqini jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iqjani jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iqmani jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iqmëni jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iqnani jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iquni jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jek iqni jek po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jel il jel po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jel ile jel po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jel ili jel po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jel ilu jel po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jel ileni jel po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jel ilini jel po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jel iluni jel po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jel ilni jel po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell ill jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell ille jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell illi jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell illma jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell illmë jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell illna jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell illu jell po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jell illeni jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illini jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illjani jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illmani jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illmëni jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illnani jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illuni jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jell illni jell po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ip rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipe rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipi rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipma rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipmë rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipna rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipu rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jep ipeni rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipini rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipjani rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipmani rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipmëni rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipnani rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipuni rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jep ipni rrjep po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdh jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhe jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhi jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhu jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhma jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhmë jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhna jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerdh irdheni jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhini jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhjani jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhmani jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhmëni jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhnani jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhuni jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerdh irdhni jerdh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgj jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgje jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgji jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgju jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgjma jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgjmë jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgjna jerg po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerg irgjeni jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjini jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjjani jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjmani jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjmëni jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjnani jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjuni jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerg irgjni jerg po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irr jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irre jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irri jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irru jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irrma jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irrmë jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irrna jerr po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jerr irreni jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irrini jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irrjani jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irrmani jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irrmëni jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irrnani jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irruni jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jerr irrni jerr po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jes it jes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jes ite jes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jes iti jes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jes itna jes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jes itu jes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 jes iteni jes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jes itini jes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jes itjani jes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jes itnani jes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jes ituni jes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 jes itni jes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ih oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh ihe oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh ihi oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh ihu oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh ihma oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh ihmë oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh ihna oh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I3 oh iheni oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihini oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihjani oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihmani oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihmëni oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihnani oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihuni oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I3 oh ihni oh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX I4 Y 59
SFX I4 0 j ua po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 je ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jma ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jmë ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jna ua po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 ju ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jani ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jeni ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jini ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jmani ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jmëni ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 jnani ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 juni ua po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 r ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 re ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 ri ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 rja ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 rma ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 rmë ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 rna ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 ru ë po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 0 reni ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 rini ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 rjani ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 rmani ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 rmëni ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 rnani ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 0 runi ë po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idh edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idhe edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idhi edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idhma edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idhmë edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idhna edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idhu edh po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 edh idheni edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhini edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhjani edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhmani edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhmëni edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhnani edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhuni edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 edh idhni edh po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 j 0 j po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 em ni em po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s 0 [^y][ae]s po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 s ni [^y][ae]s po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tja yes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 s tma yes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 s tmë yes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 s tna yes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 s tu yes po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I4 s tini yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tjani yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tmani yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tmëni yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tnani yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tuni yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I4 s tni yes po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX I5 Y 14
SFX I5 em u em po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 em uni em po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I5 as 0 bas po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 as ni bas po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I5 j hu [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 0 u [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 j ma [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 j më [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 j na [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I5 j huni [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I5 0 uni [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I5 j mani [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I5 j mëni [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I5 j nani [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

# EMRAT FEM.
